en: Pears in syrup, Canned pears in light syrup not drained, Canned pears in light syrup, pears in light syrup
bg: Круши в сироп
de: Birnen in Sirup
es: Peras en almíbar
fi: päärynät sokeriliemessä
fr: Poires au sirop, Poires au sirop léger appertisées non égouttées, Poires au sirop léger en conserve non égouttées
hr: Kruške u saftu
it: Pere sciroppate
lt: Kriaušės sirupe
nl: Peren op siroop

en: Grapefruits in syrup
de: Pampelmusen in Sirup
es: Pomelos en almíbar
fr: Pamplemousse au sirop
hr: Grejpfrut u sirupu
lt: Greipfrutai sirupe
nl: Grapefruit op siroop

en: Canned fruits in juice
da: Frugter i frugtsaft på dåse
de: Dosenfrüchte im Saft
es: Conservas de frutas en zumo
fi: Purkitetut hedelmät omassa mehussaan
fr: Fruits en conserve au jus
hr: Konzervirano voće u soku
lt: Konservuoti vaisiai savose sultyse
nl: Fruit in blik/pot op sap
pt: Conservas de frutas em suco
sv: Frukter i fruktsaft på burk

en: Canned pineapples in juice, Pineapple in juice
da: Dåseananasser i juice
de: Dosenananas im Saft, Ananas im Saft
es: Piña en conserva en zumo, Conservas de piña en zumo, Conservas de piña en su zumo
fi: Ananasta omassa mehussaan
fr: Ananas au jus
hr: Ananas u soku
lt: Ananasai savose sultyse
nl: Ananas op sap
sv: Burkananaser i juice

en: Canned pineapple slices in juice
da: Ananasskiver i juice på dåse
de: Dosenananasscheibe im Saft
fr: Ananas en tranches au jus
nl: Ananasschijfje op sap in blik/pot
sv: Ananasskivor i juice på burk

en: Canned pineapple chunks in juice
sv: Ananasbitar i juice på burk, Burkananas i bitar i juice, Ananas i bitar i juice på burk

en: Canned mixed fruits in juice, Canned fruit cocktails in juice
da: Blandede frugter i frugtsaft på dåse
sv: Blandade frukter i fruktsaft på burk

en: Syrup for canned fruits
fr: Sirop pour fruits appertisés
hr: Sirup za konzervirano voće
lt: Sirupai konservuotiems vaisiams

en: Light syrup for canned fruits
fr: Sirop léger pour fruits appertisés

en: Condiments, Seasonings
ca: Condiments
da: Krydderier
de: Gewürzmittel, Würzen, Würze
es: Condimentos, Aderezos
fi: mausteet
fr: Condiments, Assaisonnements, assaisonnement
he: מתבלים, מטבלים, תיבול
hr: začini, začin
hu: Fűszerek
it: Condimenti
ja: 調味料
lt: Pagardai
nl: Smaakmakers
pl: Przyprawy, przyprawa
pt: Condimentos
sv: Smaktillsatser
zh: 调味品, 调料

en: Gravy
xx: Gravy
ar: جريفي
de: Bratensauce
fr: Sauce au jus de viande
it: Salsa gravy
nl: Jus
pl: Jus
pt: Molho de carne
ru: Подливка
sv: Sky

en: Sauces and Condiments variety packs
de: Saucen- und Gewürzmittelmischpackungen
es: Paquetes variados de salsas - productos para untar y condimentos
fr: Assortiments de sauces et condiments
hr: Paketi raznih umaka i začina
it: Confezioni miste di salse e condimenti
nl: Assortimenten van sauzen en smaakmakers
pt: Packs Variados de Molhos - Pastas para Barrar - Dips y Condimentos

en: Condiment variety packs
de: Gewürzmittelmischpackungen
es: Paquetes variados de condimentos
fr: Assortiments d'assaisonnements
hr: Pakiranja raznih začina
it: Confezioni miste di condimenti
nl: Kruidenassortimenten
pt: Packs variados de temperos y extractos

en: Nutritional yeast
bg: Хранителна мая
fr: Levure alimentaire
hr: Hranjivi kvasac
lt: Maistinės mielės
pl: Płatki drożdżowe nieaktywne

en: Gomasio, Gomashio
fr: Gomasio, Gomashio
hr: Gomasio
it: Gomasio
ja: 胡麻塩
ko: 고마시오
nl: Gomasio
pt: Gomasio
sv: Gomasio

en: Condiment pastes
da: Krydderipastaer
de: Gewürzmittelpasten
es: Pastas de condimentos
fi: Mausteettahnat
fr: Pâtes de condiments
hr: Začini paste, Začin paste
it: Pasta di condimenti
lt: Pagardai pasta
nl: Smaakmakerpastas
pl: Pasty przyprawa
sv: Smaktillsatspastor

en: Anchovy paste
de: Sardellenpaste
es: Pasta de anchoas
fi: anjovistahna
fr: Pâte d'anchois
hr: Pasta od inćuna
it: Pasta di acciughe, pasta d'acciughe
ja: アンチョビペースト
nl: Ansjovispasta

en: Wasabi pastes
da: Wasabipastaer
de: Wasabi Pasten, Wasabipaste
es: Pastas de wasabi
fi: Wasabitahnat
fr: Pâtes au wasabi, pâtes de wasabi
hr: Wasabi paste
it: Pasta di wasabi
lt: Vasabi pasta
nb: Wasabipastaer
nl: Wasabipastas
nn: Wasabipastaer, Wasabipastaar
pl: Pasty wasabi
sv: Wasabipastor, Wasabikrämer

en: Curry pastes, Curry paste
da: Karrypastaer
de: Currypasten, Currypaste
es: Pasta de curry
fi: Currytahnat
fr: Pâtes de curry, Curry paste
hr: Curry paste
it: Pasta di curry
lt: Kario pasta
nb: Karripastaer
nl: Curry pastas
nn: Karripastaer, Karripastaar
pl: Pasty curry
sv: Currypastor

en: Red curry pastes, Red curry paste
da: Røde karrypastaer
de: Rote Currypasten, Rote Currypaste
fr: Pâtes de curry rouges
hr: Crvene curry paste
lt: Raudonojo kario pasta
nb: Røde karripastaer
nl: Rode currypastas
nn: Raude karripastaer
pl: Czerwone pasty curry
sv: Röda currypastor